Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-113
Records; prescribe; inspection.

The commission may prescribe the forms of any and all accounts and records to be kept by a regulated motor carrier as defined in section 75-302 or common carriers subject to its jurisdiction, including the accounts, records, and memoranda of the movement of traffic as well as the receipts and expenditures of money. The commission shall not prohibit any such carrier from capitalizing on its balance sheet the value of any certificate or permit held by such carrier. The commission shall at all times have access to all accounts, records, and memoranda kept by such carriers, and it shall be unlawful for such carriers to keep any other accounts, records, or memoranda than those prescribed or approved by the commission, except as provided in this section.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 13, p. 1358;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 34;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 5.